en: calcium lactate
bg: Калциев лактат
cs: mléčnan vápenatý
de: Calciumlaktat
el: γαλακτικό ασβέστιο
es: lactato de calcio
et: kaltsiumlaktaat
fi: kalsiumlaktaatti
fr: lactate de calcium
hu: kalcium-laktát
it: lattato di calcio
ja: 乳酸カルシウム
lt: kalcio laktatas
lv: kalcija laktāts
mt: lattat tal-kalċju
nl: calciumlactaat
pl: mleczan wapnia
pt: lactato de cálcio
ro: lactat de calciu
sk: mliečnan vápenatý
sl: kalcijev laktat
sv: kalciumlaktat

en: Calcium phosphate
fr: Phosphate de calcium, orthophosphate de calcium
it: Fosfato di calcio

en: calcium hydroxide, E526, E-526, E 526
ar: هيدروكسيد الكالسيوم
az: Kalsium hidroksid
bg: Калциев хидроксид
bn: ক্যালসিয়াম হাইড্রোক্সাইড
bs: Kalcij hidroksid
ca: hidròxid de calci
cs: Hydroxid vápenatý
da: calciumhydroxid
de: Calciumhydroxid
el: Υδροξειδιο του ασβεστιου
eo: Kalcia hidroksido
es: hidróxido de calcio, hidróxido cálcico
et: Kaltsiumhüdroksiid
eu: Kaltzio hidroxido
fa: کلسیم هیدروکسید
fi: Kalsiumhydroksidi
fr: hydroxyde de calcium
gl: Hidróxido de calcio
hi: कैल्सियम हाइड्रॉक्साइड
hr: Kalcijev hidroksid
hu: Kalcium-hidroxid
hy: Կալցիումի հիդրօքսիդ
id: Kalsium hidroksida
it: idrossido di calcio
ja: 水酸化カルシウム
ka: კალციუმის ჰიდროქსიდი
kk: Езілген әк
ko: 수산화 칼슘
ky: Кальций гидроксиди
la: Calx exstincta
lt: Kalcio hidroksidas
lv: Kalcija hidroksīds
ms: Kalsium hidroksida
mt: Idrossidu tal-kalċju
nb: Kalsiumhydroksid
nl: calciumhydroxide
pl: Wodorotlenek wapnia
pt: Hidróxido de cálcio
ro: Hidroxid de calciu
ru: Гидроксид кальция
sh: Kalcijum hidroksid
si: කැල්සියම් හයිඩ්‍රොක්සයිඩ්
sk: Hydroxid vápenatý
sl: Kalcijev hidroksid
sq: karbonat kalciumi
sr: калцијум хидроксид
sv: Kalciumhydroxid
ta: கால்சியம் ஐதராக்சைடு
te: కాల్సియం హైడ్రాక్సైడ్
th: แคลเซียมไฮดรอกไซด์
tl: Calcium hydroxide
tr: Kalsiyum hidroksit
uk: Гідроксид кальцію
vi: Canxi hiđroxit
zh: 氢氧化钙

en: calcium oxide
bg: Калциев оксид
cs: oxid vápenatý
de: Calciumoxid
el: οξείδιο του ασβεστίου
es: óxido de calcio
et: kaltsiumoksiid
fi: kalsiumoksidi
fr: oxyde de calcium
hu: kalcium-oxid
it: ossido di calcio
ja: 酸化カルシウム
lt: kalcio oksidas
lv: kalcija oksīds
mt: ossidu tal-kalċju
nl: calciumoxide
pl: tlenek wapnia
pt: óxido de cálcio
ro: oxid de calciu
sk: oxid vápenatý
sl: kalcijev oksid
sv: kalciumoxid

en: calcium sulfate
bg: Калциев сулфат
cs: síran vápenatý
de: Calciumsulfat
el: θειικό ασβέστιο
es: sulfato de calcio
et: kaltsiumsulfaat
fi: kalsiumsulfaatti
fr: sulfate de calcium
hu: kalcium-szulfát
it: solfato di calcio
ja: 硫酸カルシウム
lt: kalcio sulfatas
lv: kalcija sulfāts
mt: sulfat tal-kalċju
nl: calciumsulfaat
pl: siarczan wapnia
pt: sulfato de cálcio
ro: sulfat de calciu
sk: síran vápenatý
sl: kalcijev sulfat
sv: kalciumsulfat

en: calcium bisglycinate
bg: Калциев бисглицинат
cs: bisglycinát vápenatý
de: Calciumbisglycinat
el: διγλυκινικό ασβέστιο
es: bisglicinato de calcio
et: kaltsiumdiglütsinaat
fi: kalsiumbisglysinaatti
fr: bisglycinate de calcium
hu: kalcium-biszglicinát
it: bisglicinato di calcio
lt: kalcio bisglicinatas
lv: kalcija bisglicināts
mt: bisgliċinat tal-kalċju
nl: calciumbisglycinaat
pl: diglicynian wapnia
pt: bisglicinato de cálcio
ro: bisglicinat de calciu
sk: bisglycinát vápenatý
sl: kalcijev bisglicinat
sv: kalciumbisglycinat

en: calcium citrate malate
bg: Калциев цитрат малат
cs: vápenatá sůl kyseliny citronové a jablečné
de: Calciumcitratmalat
el: κιτρικό μηλικό ασβέστιο
es: citrato malato de calcio
et: kaltsiumtsitraatmalaat
fi: kalsiumsitraattimalaatti
fr: citrate-malate de calcium
hu: kalcium-citrát-malát
it: citrato-malato di calcio
lt: kalcio citrato malatas
lv: kalcija citrāta malāts
mt: malat ċitrat tal-kalċju
nl: calciumcitraatmalaat
pl: cytrynian i jabłczan wapnia
pt: Citrato-malato de cálcio
ro: malat citrat de calciu
sk: citran-malát vápenatý
sl: kalcijev citrat malat
sv: kalciumcitratmalat

en: calcium citrate
fr: citrate de calcium
it: citrato di calcio, citrati di calcio
ja: クエン酸カルシウム
nl: calciumcitraat

en: calcium malate
bg: Калциев малат
cs: jablečnan vápenatý
de: Calciummalat
el: μηλικό ασβέστιο
es: malato cálcico
et: kaltsiummalaat
fi: kalsiummalaatti
fr: malate de calcium
hu: kalcium-malát
it: malato di calcio
lt: kalcio malatas
lv: kalcija malāts
mt: malat tal-kalċju
nl: calciummalaat
pl: jabłczan wapnia
pt: malato de cálcio
ro: malat de calciu
sk: jablčnan vápenatý
sl: kalcijev malat
sv: kalciummalat

en: calcium L-pidolate
bg: Калциев L-пидолат
cs: L-pyroglutaman vápenatý
de: Calcium-L-pidolat
el: L-πιδολικό ασβέστιο
es: L-pidolato de calcio
et: kaltsium-L-pidolaat
fi: kalsium-L-pidolaatti
fr: L-pidolate de calcium
hu: kalcium-L-pidolát
it: L-pidolato di calcio
lt: kalcio L-pidolatas
lv: kalcija L-pidolāts
mt: L-pidolat tal-kalċju
nl: calcium-L-pidolaat
pl: L-pidolan wapnia
pt: L-pidolato de cálcio
ro: L-pidolat de calciu
sk: L-pidolát vápenatý
sl: kalcijev L-pidolat
sv: kalcium L-pidolat

en: Magnesium
af: magnesium
am: ማግኒዥየም
an: Magnesio
ar: مغنسيوم
az: Maqnezium
be: магній
bg: Магнезий
bn: ম্যাগনেসিয়াম
bo: དཀར་གཡའ།
br: Magneziom
bs: magnezij
ca: magnesi
co: Magnesiu
cs: Hořčík
cv: Магни
cy: Magnesiwm
da: magnesium
de: Magnesium
dv: މެގްނީޒިއަމް
el: Μαγνήσιο
eo: magnezio
es: Magnesio
et: Magneesium
eu: magnesio
fa: منیزیم
fo: Magnesium
fr: Magnésium
fy: Magnesium
ga: Maignéisiam
gd: Magnesium
gl: magnesio
gu: મેગ્નેશિયમ
gv: Magnaishum
he: מגנזיום
hi: मैग्नेशियम तत्त्व
hr: magnezij
ht: Manyezyòm
hu: Magnézium
hy: մագնեզիումia:magnesium
id: magnesium
io: magnezo
is: magnesín
it: Magnesio
ja: マグネシウム
jv: Magnesium
ka: მაგნიუმი
ki: Magnesium
kk: Магний
km: ម៉ាញ៉េស្យូម
kn: ಮ್ಯಗ್ನೀಶಿಯಮ್
ko: 마그네슘
ku: Magnezyûm
kv: Магний
ky: Магний
la: magnesium
lb: Magnesium
li: Magnesium
ln: Manezu
lt: Magnis
lv: Magnijs
mi: konupora
mk: Магнезиум
ml: മഗ്നീഷ്യം
mn: Магни
mr: मॅग्नेशियम
ms: Magnesium
mt: Manjesju
my: မဂ္ဂနီစီယမ်
nb: magnesium
ne: म्याग्नेसियम
nl: Magnesium
nn: magnesium
nv: Béésh Łikoní
oc: Magnèsi
or: ମାଗ୍ନେସିଅମ
pa: ਮੈਗਨੇਸ਼ਿਅਮ
pi: म्याग्नेजियम
pl: Magnez
pt: Magnésio
qu: Qunta q'illay
ro: Magneziu
ru: магний
sa: म्याग्नेजियम
sh: Magnezij
si: මැග්නීසියම්
sk: Horčík
sl: Magnezij
so: Magniisiyaam
sq: Magneziumi
sr: магнезијум
su: Magnésium
sv: magnesium
sw: Magnesi
ta: மக்னீசியம்
te: మెగ్నీషియం
tg: Магний
th: แมกนีเซียม
tl: Magnesyo
tr: magnezyum
tt: Магний
ug: ماگنىي
uk: магній
uz: Magniy
vi: magiê
yi: מאגנעזיום
yo: Magnésíọ̀mù
zh: 镁

en: magnesium acetate
bg: Магнезиев ацетат
cs: octan hořečnatý
de: Magnesiumacetat
el: οξικό μαγνήσιο
es: acetato de magnesio
et: magneesiumatsetaat
fi: magnesiumasetaatti
fr: acétate de magnésium
hu: magnézium-acetát
it: acetato di magnesio
lt: magnio acetatas
lv: magnija acetāts
mt: aċetat tal-manjesju
nl: magnesiumacetaat
pl: octan magnezu
pt: acetato de magnésio
ro: acetat de magneziu
sk: octan horečnatý
sl: magnezijev acetat
sv: magnesiumacetat

en: magnesium carbonate
bg: Магнезиев карбонат
cs: uhličitan hořečnatý
de: Magnesiumcarbonat
el: ανθρακικό μαγνήσιο
es: carbonato de magnesio
et: magneesiumkarbonaat
fi: magnesiumkarbonaatti
fr: carbonate de magnésium
hu: magnézium-karbonát
it: carbonato di magnesio
ja: 炭酸マグネシウム
lt: magnio karbonatas
lv: magnija karbonāts
mt: karbonat tal-manjesju
nl: magnesiumcarbonaat
pl: węglan magnezu
pt: carbonato de magnésio
ro: carbonat de magneziu
sk: uhličitan horečnatý
sl: magnezijev karbonat
sv: magnesiumkarbonat

en: magnesium chloride
ar: كلوريد المغنسيوم
bg: Магнезиев хлорид
bs: Magnezij hlorid
ca: clorur de magnesi
cs: Chlorid hořečnatý
da: Magnesiumchlorid
de: Magnesiumchlorid
el: Χλωριουχο μαγνησιο
eo: magnezia klorido
es: cloruro de magnesio
et: Magneesiumkloriid
fa: کلرید منیزیم
fi: Magnesiumkloridi
fr: chlorure de magnésium
ga: clóiríd mhaignéisiam
gl: Cloruro de magnesio
gv: Cloreed vagnaishum
hi: मैग्नीसियम क्लोराइड
hu: Magnézium-klorid
it: cloruro di magnesio
ja: 塩化マグネシウム
ky: Магний хлориди
lt: Magnio chloridas
lv: Magnija hlorīds
mt: Klorur tal-manjeżju
nl: Magnesiumchloride
pl: Chlorek magnezu
pt: cloreto de magnésio
ro: Clorură de magneziu
sh: Magnezijum hlorid
sk: Chlorid horečnatý
sl: Magnezijev klorid
sr: магнезијум хлорид
sv: Magnesiumklorid
ta: மெக்னீசயம் குளோரைடு
uk: Хлорид магнію
vi: Magie clorua
zh: 氯化镁

en: magnesium salts of citric acid
bg: Магнезиеви соли на лимонената киселина
cs: hořečnaté soli kyseliny citronové
de: Magnesiumsalze der Zitronensäure
el: άλατα μαγνησίου του κιτρικού οξέος
es: sales magnésicas de ácido cítrico
et: sidrunhappe magneesiumisoolad
fi: sitruunahapon magnesiumsuolat
fr: sels de magnésium de l’acide citrique
hu: magnézium citromsavval alkotott sói
it: sali di magnesio dell’acido citrico
lt: citrinų rūgšties magnio druskos
lv: citronskābes magnija sāļi
mt: melħ tal-manjesju tal-aċidu ċitriku
nl: magnesiumzouten van citroenzuur
pl: sole magnezowe kwasu cytrynowego
pt: sais de magnésio do ácido cítrico
ro: săruri de magneziu ale acidului citric
sk: horečnaté soli kyseliny citrónovej
sl: magnezijeve soli citronske kisline
sv: magnesiumsalter av citronsyra

en: magnesium gluconate
bg: Магнезиев глюконат
cs: glukonát hořečnatý
de: Magnesiumgluconat
el: γλυκονικό μαγνήσιο
es: gluconato de magnesio
et: magneesiumglükonaat
fi: magnesiumglukonaatti
fr: gluconate de magnésium
hu: magnézium-glükonát
it: gluconato di magnesio
lt: magnio gliukonatas
lv: magnija glikonāts
mt: glukonat tal-manjesju
nl: magnesiumgluconaat
pl: glukonian magnezu
pt: gluconato de magnésio
ro: gluconat de magneziu
sk: glukónan horečnatý
sl: magnezijev glukonat
sv: magnesiumglukonat

en: magnesium glycerophosphate
bg: Магнезиев глицерофосфат
cs: glycerofosfát hořečnatý
de: Magnesiumglycerophosphat
el: γλυκεροφωσφορικό μαγνήσιο
es: glicerofosfato de magnesio
et: magneesiumglütserofosfaat
fi: magnesiumglyserofosfaatti
fr: glycérophosphate de magnésium
hu: magnézium-glicerofoszfát
it: glicerofosfato di magnesio
lt: magnio glicerofosfatas
lv: magnija glicerofosfāts
mt: gliċerofosfat tal-manjesju
nl: magnesiumglycerofosfaat
pl: glicerofosforan magnezu
pt: glicerofosfato de magnésio
ro: glicerofosfat de magneziu
sk: glycerofosforečnan horečnatý
sl: magnezijev glicerofosfat
sv: magnesiumglycerolfosfat

en: Magnesium phosphate
fr: Phosphate de magnesium, orthophosphate de magnesium
it: magnesio fosfato, fosfato di magnesio

en: magnesium salts of orthophosphoric acid
bg: Магнезиеви соли на ортофосфорната киселина
cs: hořečnaté soli kyseliny fosforečné
de: Magnesiumsalze der Orthophosphorsäure
el: άλατα μαγνησίου του ορθοφωσφορικού οξέος
es: sales magnésicas de ácido ortofosfórico
et: ortofosforhappe magneesiumisoolad
fi: ortofosforihapon magnesiumsuolat
fr: sels de magnésium de l’acide orthophosphorique
hu: magnézium ortofoszforsavval alkotott sói
it: sali di magnesio dell’acido ortofosforico
lt: ortofosforo rūgšties magnio druskos
lv: ortofosforskābes magnija sāļi
mt: melħ tal-manjesju tal-aċidu ortofosforiku
nl: magnesiumzouten van orthofosforzuur
pl: sole magnezowe kwasu ortofosforowego
pt: sais de magnésio do ácido ortofosfórico
ro: săruri de magneziu ale acidului ortofosforic
sk: horečnaté soli kyseliny ortofosforečnej
sl: magnezijeve soli ortofosforne kisline
sv: magnesiumsalter av ortofosforsyra

en: magnesium lactate
bg: Магнезиев лактат
cs: mléčnan hořečnatý
de: Magnesiumlactat
el: γαλακτικό μαγνήσιο
es: lactato de magnesio
et: magneesiumlaktaat
fi: magnesiumlaktaatti
fr: lactate de magnésium
hu: magnézium-laktát
it: lattato di magnesio
lt: magnio laktatas
lv: magnija laktāts
mt: laktat tal-manjesju
nl: magnesiumlactaat
pl: mleczan magnezu
pt: lactato de magnésio
ro: lactat de magneziu
sk: mliečnan horečnatý
sl: magnezijev laktat
sv: magnesiumlaktat